Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0511.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 301. (1) Any Except as otherwise allowed by law, a person, or his or her whether acting on the person's own behalf or as an agent or employee, who, directly or indirectly, takes, receives, or accepts from any person any money or a valuable thing with the agreement, understanding, or allegation that any money or a valuable thing will be paid or delivered to any person, where if the payment or delivery is alleged to be or will be is contingent upon on the result of any a race, contest, or game or upon on the happening of any an event not known by the parties to be certain, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00.$5,000.00. (2) This section does not apply to a game, wager, or other transaction to which all of the following apply: (a) The transaction is incidental to a bona fide social relationship. (b) Not more than 100 individuals participate in the transaction. (c) The maximum total amount wagered by an individual is $25.00. (d) Other than the wagers, no other money or thing of value is paid to participate in the transaction. (e) The entire amount of the wagers is paid to 1 or more participants as a prize. (f) The organizer of the game, wager, or other transaction is a participant, and the benefit to the organizer is only the potential to win the same prizes eligible to be won by other participants. (g) The game, wager, or other transaction does not take place inside a gambling establishment, restaurant, entertainment venue, or bar, and is not promoted by a business with the intent to bring in extra customers to the business.